apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
	<sdef n="sint"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




<!-- Paradigmes ADJ BCN-->


 
  <pardef n="expensive__adj">
     <e c="CP: adjectives that form the comparative and superlative forms with more and the most respectively">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="long/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that add -er and -est to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="happ/y__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that delete -y and add -ier and -iest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="sly/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -y and directly add -er and -est to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="sh/y__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that either delete the -y and add -ier and -iest to form the comparative and superlative forms or directly add -er and -est (LR)">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>yer</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>yest</l>
        <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>  

  <pardef n="nice/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -e and therefore only add -r and -st to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>st</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="big/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -g and add -ger and -gest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ger</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="hot/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -t and add -ter and -test to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ter</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>test</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="thin/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -n and add -ner and -nest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ner</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="dim/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -m and add -mer and -mest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mer</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mest</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="common/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or adding -er and -est (LR) respectively ">
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>er</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>est</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
  </pardef>
  

<e lm="simple"><i>simple</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="able"><i>able</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dark"><i>dark</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="discreet"><i>discreet</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impure"><i>impure</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="morphosyntactic"><i>morphosyntactic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mock"><i>mock</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nude"><i>nude</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="silly"><i>sill</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hot"><i>hot</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spiky"><i>spik</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grave"><i>grave</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drunk"><i>drunk</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="modest"><i>modest</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blatant"><i>blatant</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flaky"><i>flak</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="milky"><i>milk</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cavernous"><i>cavernous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blond"><i>blond</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wry"><i>wr</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fine"><i>fine</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="thin/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="irregular"><i>irregular</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="slim"><i>slim</i><par n="dim/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="univariant"><i>univariant</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="proud"><i>proud</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prickly"><i>prickl</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brave"><i>brave</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="strange"><i>strange</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="random"><i>random</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="whitish"><i>whitish</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="conjugal"><i>conjugal</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="earthy"><i>earth</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="south"><i>south</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hairy"><i>hair</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immortal"><i>immortal</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="truthful"><i>truthful</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="quintic"><i>quintic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stray"><i>stray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="risky"><i>risk</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cold"><i>cold</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="moral"><i>moral</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="shy"><i>sh</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tender"><i>tender</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="present"><i>present</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mat"><i>mat</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exact"><i>exact</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grey"><i>grey</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="autocratic"><i>autocratic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fat"><i>fat</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="peaty"><i>peat</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vast"><i>vast</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="disyllabic"><i>disyllabic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glassy"><i>glass</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="civil"><i>civil</i><par n="common/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="keen"><i>keen</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wide"><i>wide</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fit"><i>fit</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="empty"><i>empt</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="classic"><p><l>classic</l><r>classical</r></p><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="short"><i>short</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="big"><i>big</i><par n="big/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ill"><i>ill</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="net"><i>net</i><par n="hot/__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="rhombohedric"><p><l>rhombohedric</l><r>rhombohedral</r></p><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sure"><i>sure</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="green"><i>green</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
     <par n="guionet"/>
   </e>
